Utah statutes.
63M-7-203.   Executive director -- Qualifications -- Compensation --
Appointment -- Functions.
(1)  The governor, with the consent of the Senate, shall appoint a person
experienced in the field of criminal justice and in administration as the
executive director of the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice.  The
governor shall establish the executive director's salary within the salary
range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer
Compensation.
(2) (a)  The executive director, under the direction of the commission, shall
administer the duties of the commission and act as the governor's advisor on
national, state, regional, metropolitan, and local government planning as it
relates to criminal justice.
(b)  This chapter does not derogate the planning authority conferred on state,
regional, metropolitan, and local governments by existing law.
